Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-2415
Combined improvements; act, how cited.

Sections 19-2408 to 19-2415 shall be known and may be cited as the Combined Improvement Act.

Laws 1961, c. 64, § 9, p. 255;

Laws 2003, LB 52, § 7.